Illinois, session 104th, HB561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Bond Authorization Act is amended by 5changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 305/0.01)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6600)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Bond Authorization Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-4.)